Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB850.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 258.265 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An owner shall exercise proper care and control of his or her dog to prevent the dog
from violating any local government nuisance ordinance.
(2) Any peace officer or animal control officer may seize or destroy any dog found
running at large between the hours of sunset and sunrise,[ and] unaccompanied, and
not under the control of its owner or handler. A peace officer or animal control
officer shall be under a duty to make a fair and reasonable effort to determine
whether any dog found at large between sunset and sunrise is a working livestock
dog, hound, or other hunting dog which has become lost temporarily from a pack or
wandered from immediate control of its owner[,] or handler, and if he or she is
reasonably sure that the dog is a working livestock dog or hunting dog, then he or
she shall not destroy the dog[,] unless it is found in the act of pursuing or wounding
livestock, [or] wounding or killing poultry, or attacking human beings.
(3) A working livestock dog, hound, or hunting dog may be unrestrained when engaged
in lawful working or hunting activities while on private or public property
designated or authorized for that purpose.
Page 1 of 1
BR250100.100 - 2501 - XXXX 3/3/2026 3:15 PM Jacketed